Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-2101
Legislative declaration.

The Legislature
declares it is the public policy of this state to provide adequate natural
gas pipeline facilities and service in order to expand and diversify the Nebraska
economy resulting in increased employment, new and expanded businesses and
industries, and new and expanded sources of tax revenue.

Laws 2012, LB1115, § 1.